Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.84.210

Violations by officers.

Every officer who willfully violates any of the provisions of chapter 29A.72 RCW or RCW 29A.32.010 through 29A.32.121, for the violation of which no penalty is herein prescribed, or who willfully fails to comply with the provisions of chapter 29A.72 RCW or RCW 29A.32.010 through 29A.32.121, is guilty of a gross misdemeanor punishable to the same extent as a gross misdemeanor that is punishable under RCW 9A.20.021.

[ 2013 c 11 s 80; 2003 c 111 s 2109; 1993 c 256 s 3; 1965 c 9 s 29.79.480. Prior: 1913 c 138 s 32, part; RRS s 5428, part. Formerly RCW 29.79.480.]

NOTES:

Severability—Effective date—1993 c 256: See notes following RCW 29A.84.280.